Alaska, session 34, SB277.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 11 * Section 1. AS 14.03.260(a) is amended to read: 12 (a) A local school board shall provide an approved charter school with an 01 annual program budget. The budget shall be not less than the amount generated by the 02 students enrolled in the charter school less administrative costs retained by the local 03 school district, determined by applying the indirect cost rate approved by the 04 department up to eight [FOUR] percent or the specified administrative costs, 05 whichever is less. Costs directly related to charter school facilities, including rent, 06 utilities, and maintenance, may not be included in an annual program budget for the 07 purposes of calculating the four percent cap on administrative costs under this 08 subsection. A local school board shall provide a charter school with a report itemizing 09 the administrative costs retained by the local school board under this section. The 10 "amount generated by students enrolled in the charter school" is to be determined in 11 the same manner as it would be for a student enrolled in another public school in that 12 school district and includes funds generated by grants, appropriations, federal impact 13 aid, the required local contribution, the local contribution under AS 14.17.410(c), 14 special needs under AS 14.17.420(a)(1), and secondary school vocational and 15 technical instruction under AS 14.17.420(a)(3). A school district shall direct state aid 16 under AS 14.11 for the construction or major maintenance of a charter school facility 17 to the charter school that generated the state aid, subject to the same terms and 18 conditions that apply to state aid under AS 14.11 for construction or major 19 maintenance of a school facility that is not a charter school. 20 * Sec. 2. AS 14.03.300 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 21 (c) A student who ceases to be enrolled in a correspondence study program 22 may retain textbooks, equipment, and other curriculum materials provided to the 23 student through the program, including materials purchased through an annual student 24 allotment provided to a parent or guardian of the student under AS 14.03.310. 25 * Sec. 3. AS 14.09.010(a) is amended to read: 26 (a) A school district that provides student transportation services for the 27 transportation of students who reside a distance from established schools is eligible to 28 receive funding for operating or subcontracting the operation of the transportation 29 system for students to and from the schools within the student's transportation service 30 area. Subject to appropriation, the amount of funding provided by the state for 31 operating the student transportation system is the amount of a school district's ADM, 01 less the ADM for the district's correspondence programs during the current fiscal year, 02 multiplied by the per student amount for the school district as follows, for the school 03 years beginning July 1, 2026 [2025]: 04 DISTRICT PER STUDENT AMOUNT 05 Alaska Gateway $2,694 [$2,529] 06 Aleutians East 402 [377] 07 Anchorage 564 [529] 08 Annette Island 236 [221] 09 Bering Strait 63 [59] 10 Bristol Bay 3,459 [3,247] 11 Chatham 364 [341] 12 Copper River 2,054 [1,928] 13 Cordova 435 [408] 14 Craig 548 [514] 15 Delta/Greely 2,144 [2,013] 16 Denali 2,340 [2,197] 17 Dillingham 1,577 [1,480] 18 Fairbanks 1,057 [992] 19 Galena 330 [309] 20 Haines 811 [761] 21 Hoonah 387 [363] 22 Iditarod 274 [257] 23 Juneau 781 [733] 24 Kake 352 [330] 25 Kashunamiut 7 [6] 26 Kenai Peninsula 1,185 [1,112] 27 Ketchikan 941 [833] 28 Klawock 757 [710] 29 Kodiak Island 1,035 [971] 30 Kuspuk 846 [794] 31 Lake and Peninsula 497 [466] 01 Lower Kuskokwim 359 [337] 02 Lower Yukon 2 [1] 03 Matanuska-Susitna 1,178 [1,106] 04 Nenana 761 [714] 05 Nome 805 [755] 06 North Slope 1,450 [1,361] 07 Northwest Arctic 32 [30] 08 Pelican 94 [88] 09 Petersburg 485 [455] 10 Saint Mary's 250 [234] 11 Sitka 554 [520] 12 Skagway 47 [44] 13 Southeast Island 1,496 [1,404] 14 Southwest Region 774 [726] 15 Unalaska 840 [788] 16 Valdez 953 [894] 17 Wrangell 907 [851] 18 Yakutat 963 [904] 19 Yukon Flats 342 [321] 20 Yukon/Koyukuk 388 [364] 21 Yupiit 3 [2]. 22 * Sec. 4. AS 14.14.110(a) is amended to read: 23 (a) When necessary to provide more efficient or more economical educational 24 services, a district may cooperate or the department may require a district to cooperate 25 with other districts, state-operated schools, or the Bureau of Indian Affairs in 26 providing educational or administrative services. However, if a cooperative 27 arrangement requires pupils to live away from their usual homes, the school board 28 shall provide classes within the attendance area when there are at least eight children 29 eligible to attend elementary and secondary school in the attendance area. A 30 cooperative arrangement related to providing correspondence study program 31 services must specify the amount of the administrative services fee paid to the 01 entity providing the correspondence study program services. The administrative 02 services fee shall be the indirect cost rate approved by the department up to eight 03 percent and may not include costs incurred by the entity providing the 04 correspondence study program for providing special education services, in- 05 person classes, career, technical, or vocational course fees, or extracurricular 06 fees. In this subsection, 07 (1) "administrative services" includes supervisory, maintenance, 08 purchasing, or other services that are required for unified administration; 09 (2) "educational services" includes boarding and tuition arrangements, 10 pupil or teacher exchanges, special education services, or curriculum development. 11 * Sec. 5. AS 14.17.430 is amended to read: 12 Sec. 14.17.430. State funding for correspondence study. Except as provided 13 in AS 14.17.400(b), funding for the state centralized correspondence study program or 14 a district correspondence program, including a district that offers a statewide 15 correspondence study program, includes an allocation from the public education fund 16 in an amount calculated by using [MULTIPLYING] the ADM of the correspondence 17 program reported under AS 14.17.500(a) and 14.17.600(a) [BY 90 PERCENT]. 18 * Sec. 6. AS 14.17.470 is amended to read: 19 Sec. 14.17.470. Base student allocation. The base student allocation is 20 $6,786.54 [$6,660]. 21 * Sec. 7. AS 14.17.500 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 22 (h) A district shall include in the ADM of a statewide correspondence study 23 program offered by the district a student who is enrolled in the program and resides in 24 the district. If a student is enrolled in a statewide correspondence study program but 25 does not reside in the district offering the program, the district in which the student 26 resides shall include the student in the ADM of the school in that district with the 27 lowest ADM, as determined by the most recent student count data for the district. 28 * Sec. 8. AS 14.20.015(a) is amended to read: 29 (a) The department shall issue a preliminary teacher certificate to an out-of- 30 state teacher who meets the requirements of this section. To be eligible for a 31 preliminary teacher certificate, a person shall 01 (1) have received at least a baccalaureate degree from an institution of 02 higher education accredited by a recognized institutional [REGIONAL] accrediting 03 association or approved by the commissioner; 04 (2) hold a valid teacher certificate issued by another state; 05 (3) have submitted fingerprints to the department to be used for a 06 criminal history background check and been found by the department to be suitable for 07 employment as a teacher under AS 14.20.020(f); 08 (4) have paid the fee required by the department under 09 AS 14.20.020(c). 10 * Sec. 9. AS 14.20.020(b) is amended to read: 11 (b) A person is not eligible for a teacher certificate unless that person has 12 received at least a baccalaureate degree from an institution of higher education 13 accredited by a recognized institutional [REGIONAL] accrediting association or 14 approved by the commissioner and, if applicable, has passed the examination or 15 examinations required by (i) of this section. However, this subsection is not applicable 16 to 17 (1) persons employed in the state public school system on 18 September 1, 1962; 19 (2) persons issued an emergency certificate during a situation that, in 20 the judgment of the commissioner, requires the temporary issuance of a certificate to a 21 person not otherwise qualified. 22 * Sec. 10. AS 14.20.022(b) is amended to read: 23 (b) To be eligible for a subject-matter expert limited teacher certificate, a 24 person shall 25 (1) hold at least a baccalaureate degree from an institution of higher 26 education accredited by a recognized institutional [REGIONAL] or national 27 accrediting association or approved by the commissioner and 28 (A) have majored or minored in the subject that the person will 29 be teaching; or 30 (B) have at least five years of experience in the subject matter 31 that the person will be teaching; 01 (2) have submitted fingerprints and the fees required by the 02 Department of Public Safety under AS 12.62.160 for criminal justice information and 03 a national criminal history record check to the department; the department must have 04 submitted the fingerprints and fees to the Department of Public Safety for a report of 05 criminal justice information under AS 12.62 and a national criminal history record 06 check under AS 12.62.400 and the person must have been found by the department to 07 be suitable for employment as a teacher under AS 14.20.020(f); and 08 (3) be currently enrolled in an approved post-baccalaureate teacher 09 education program at an [A REGIONALLY ACCREDITED] institution accredited 10 by an institutional accrediting association meeting the requirements of 11 AS 14.20.020(b) that provides for completion of the regular teacher certificate 12 education requirements within two years after receipt of a subject-matter expert 13 limited teacher certificate under this section. 14 * Sec. 11. AS 14.20.136(a) is amended to read: 15 (a) Subject to (b) - (d) of this section, a school district or regional resource 16 center established under AS 14.12.150 may reemploy a member who is retired under 17 a retirement plan established in AS 14.25.009 - 14.25.220, or a member who is retired 18 under a retirement plan established in AS 14.25.310 - 14.25.590. In this subsection, 19 "school district" has the meaning given in AS 14.30.350. 20 * Sec. 12. AS 14.20.136(b) is amended to read: 21 (b) A member who is retired under AS 14.25.110(a) may not be reemployed 22 under (a) of this section unless the member 23 (1) certifies that the member and the school district or regional 24 resource center did not arrange before the member retired from the school district or 25 regional resource center for the member to be reemployed by the school district or 26 regional resource center after the member retired; and 27 (2) has been retired for at least 28 (A) 60 days if the member is at least 62 years of age; or 29 (B) six months if the member is less than 62 years of age. 30 * Sec. 13. AS 14.20.136(c) is amended to read: 31 (c) Before reemploying a retired member under (a) of this section to fill a 01 position, a school district or regional resource center shall 02 (1) by resolution, adopt a policy that describes the circumstances of a 03 shortage or anticipated shortage of applicants, other than retired members, who are 04 qualified for particular positions and permits rehiring that complies with the 05 requirements of this section; and 06 (2) publicly advertise the position for 10 business days and actively 07 recruit to fill the position by hiring a person other than a member who is retired. 08 * Sec. 14. AS 14.20.136(e) is amended to read: 09 (e) A school district or regional resource center that reemploys a member 10 under this section who is retired under the defined benefit retirement plan established 11 in AS 14.25.009 - 14.25.220 is required to 12 (1) provide the administrator with 13 (A) a copy of the resolution and policy adopted under (c) of 14 this section; and 15 (B) for every retired member who is rehired, a report 16 identifying the member by name and describing the 17 (i) circumstances of the shortage that necessitated the 18 rehire; and 19 (ii) actions taken by the school district or regional 20 resource center to comply with [SCHOOL DISTRICT] policy adopted 21 under (c) of this section and the requirements of this section; and 22 (2) make contributions under AS 14.25.070. 23 * Sec. 15. AS 14.25.043(f) is amended to read: 24 (f) If a member who retired under AS 14.25.110(a) is reemployed by a school 25 district or regional resource center under AS 14.20.136, 26 (1) the member does not become an active member; 27 (2) the member shall continue to receive retirement benefits from the 28 plan as though the member were not reemployed by the school district or regional 29 resource center; 30 (3) deductions from the member's salary may not be made under 31 AS 14.25.050; and 01 (4) the member may not receive credited service in the plan during the 02 period of reemployment. 03 * Sec. 16. AS 14.25.043(g) is amended to read: 04 (g) Notwithstanding (f) of this section, a member who is retired under 05 AS 14.25.110(a) and reemployed by a school district or regional resource center 06 under AS 14.20.136 is eligible to receive the group health plan coverage provided to 07 active members employed by that school district or regional resource center. 08 * Sec. 17. AS 14.30.773(a) is amended to read: 09 (a) A [SUBJECT TO APPROPRIATION, A] school district is eligible to 10 receive a reading proficiency incentive grant of not less than $450 for each student in 11 kindergarten through grade six who, at the end of the school year, 12 (1) performs at grade-level reading proficiency; or 13 (2) demonstrates improvement on a reading screening tool approved 14 by the department, on a standards-based assessment in language arts approved by the 15 department, or on a student portfolio in language arts approved by the department. 16 * Sec. 18. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 17 read: 18 LEGISLATIVE BUDGET AND AUDIT COMMITTEE STUDY OF PUBLIC 19 SCHOOL FUNDING. The Legislative Budget and Audit Committee shall procure a study to 20 be completed not later than January 1, 2027, by an entity or entities with expertise in school 21 finance to evaluate the current education funding provisions and either recommend changes to 22 the current funding provisions or recommend alternative methods of education funding. The 23 study must 24 (1) be produced in consultation with the Institute of Social and Economic 25 Research at the University of Alaska Anchorage; and 26 (2) include consideration of 27 (A) stable and predictable funding for basic education needs and an 28 ancillary system of providing funding above basic education needs; 29 (B) geographic location and specific student subpopulations, as 30 appropriate; 31 (C) appropriate proportions and mechanisms for state and local 01 contributions to public school funding; and 02 (D) methods for funding alternative public school options, including 03 charter schools, residential schools, and correspondence programs. 04 * Sec. 19. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 05 read: 06 APPLICABILITY. Sections 11 - 16 of this Act apply to contracts made on or after the 07 effective date of this Act. 08 * Sec. 20. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.